Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1185.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 907 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 907. Surcharge by Auditors.--* * *(c) An elected or appointed officer of a township may not be surcharged if the officer acted in good faith reliance on a written, nonconfidential opinion of the solicitor of the township or an opinion of the township solicitor publicly stated at an open meeting of the township and recorded in the official minutes of the meeting. This subsection shall not apply if the solicitor's opinion has been rendered under duress or if the 1234567891011121314151617181920 parties seeking and rendering the solicitor's opinion have colluded to purposefully commit a violation of law. As used in this subsection, the term "solicitor" shall include a special counsel appointed by the township for a specific matter.Section 2. Section 1301 of the act is amended to read:Section 1301. Township Manager; Appointment, Removal, Powers and Duties; Compensation; Bond.--(a) The board of supervisors may by ordinance at any time create the office of township manager and may in like manner abolish the office. While the office exists, the board of supervisors shall appoint one [person] individual, partnership, limited partnership, association or professional corporation as the township manager to fill the office. The township manager shall serve at the pleasure of the board of supervisors, subject to contractual rights that may arise under an employment or professional services agreement that may be entered into in accordance with subsection (a.1).(a.1) The board of supervisors may enter into an employment or professional services agreement with the township manager. The employment or professional services agreement may set forth the terms and conditions of employment, and the agreement may provide that it shall remain in effect for a specified period terminating no later than two years after the effective date of the agreement or the date of the board of supervisors' organizational meeting following the next municipal election, whichever shall first occur. An employment or professional services agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection may specify conditions under which a township manager would be entitled to severance compensation[, but in] if the township manager is an individual, or payments for the termination of 20250HB1185PN1334 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointment if the township manager is a partnership, limited partnership, an association or professional corporation. In no event shall an employment or professional services agreement guarantee retention or employment through the term of the agreement or confer upon the township manager any legal remedy based on specific performance.(b) The powers and duties of the township manager shall be established by ordinance. The compensation shall be set by resolution and paid out of the general fund of the township. The board of supervisors may delegate, subject to recall, any of their nonlegislative powers and duties to the township manager. The township manager shall give bond to the township, with sufficient surety, in the amount directed by the board of supervisors, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the office.(b.1) The township manager, if an individual, and, for a partnership, limited partnership, association or professional corporation appointed as the township manager, each officer and employe directly providing services as required or authorized by an agreement shall be considered a public official for purposes of the provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to restricted activities).(c) The office of township manager is not incompatible with the office of township secretary, township treasurer or any other township office or employment, except that of supervisor, auditor or township police officer. In the case of a partnership, limited partnership, association or professional corporation appointed as township manager, the restriction under this subsection shall apply to all officers and employes who directly provide services as required or authorized by an 20250HB1185PN1334 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1185PN1334 - 4 - 12